Utah statutes.
26-6b-7.   Periodic review of individuals under court order.

(1)  At least two weeks prior to the expiration of the designated period of any court order still in effect, the petitioner shall inform the court that issued the order that the order is about to expire. The petitioner shall immediately reexamine the reasons upon which the court's order was based.  If the petitioner determines that the conditions justifying that order no longer exist, it shall discharge the individual from involuntary quarantine, isolation, or treatment and report its action to the court for a termination of the order. Otherwise, the court shall schedule a hearing prior to the expiration of its order and proceed under Sections 26-6b-4 through 26-6b-6.

(2)  The petitioner responsible for the care of an individual under a court order of involuntary quarantine, isolation, or treatment for an indeterminate period shall at six-month intervals reexamine the reasons upon which the order of indeterminate duration was based.  If the petitioner determines that the conditions justifying that the court's order no longer exist, the petitioner shall discharge the individual from involuntary quarantine, isolation, or treatment and immediately report its action to the court for a termination of the order.  If the petitioner determines that the conditions justifying the involuntary quarantine, isolation, or treatment continue to exist, the petitioner shall send a written report of those findings to the court.  The petitioner shall notify the individual and his counsel of record in writing that the involuntary quarantine, isolation, or treatment will be continued, the reasons for that decision, and that the individual has the right to a review hearing by making a request to the court. Upon receiving the request for a review, the court shall immediately set a hearing date and proceed under Sections 26-6b-4 through 26-6b-6.

